Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1691, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Municipal electric utility exemption. new text end new text begin (a) A municipal electric utility located in the city of Hibbing that was in operation before the commission's decision in docket number 24-352 is exempt from: new text end new text begin (1) a requirement to submit a facility specific life-cycle analysis of waste-derived fuel; new text end new text begin (2) a requirement to submit a fuel mix report; and new text end new text begin (3) reevaluation requirements. new text end new text begin (b) The electricity generated by waste-derived fuel at a municipal electric utility must be considered when determining whether the municipal electric utility satisfies the eligible energy technology standard under subdivision 2a. new text end